Adpositions.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@U.ALIEN.NO@
@U.ALIEN.YES@
-1sg.poss
-2sg.poss
-3sg.poss
-1pl.poss
-2pl.poss
-3pl.poss
-n'
-ka'
-y
-k
-h
-ka% ay
-h% lhik

LEXICON Root
    AdposPossclass ;

LEXICON AdposPossclass 
@U.ALIEN.NO@ Adpositions ;

LEXICON Adpositions
alh SetE ;
ʃa SetE ;
neelha SetE ;
hiná SetE ;
ʃam'a SetE ;
par'a SetE ;
ɨɨlɨ SetE ;
huuʃi SetE ;
ti'i SetE ;
'i SetE ;
kiki SetE ;

LEXICON SetE
@U.ALIEN.NO@-1sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-n' # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@-2sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka' # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@-1pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-k # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@-2pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka% ay # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@-3pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-h% lhik # ;
@U.ALIEN.YES@ # ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@ # ;
